Washington statutes.
RCW 19.58.030

Blind bidding or blind selling prohibited—Trade screening required—Notice.

(1) The buying or selling of the right to exhibit a feature motion picture by blind bidding or blind selling is prohibited within the state.

(2) No bids may be returnable, no negotiations for the exhibition or licensing of a motion picture may take place, and no license agreement or any of its terms may be agreed upon, for the exhibition of a feature motion picture within the state before the feature motion picture has either been trade screened or otherwise made available for viewing by all exhibitors within the state.

(3) A distributor shall provide reasonable and uniform notice of the trade screening of feature motion pictures to those exhibitors within the state from whom bids will be solicited or with whom negotiations will be conducted for the license or right to exhibit the feature motion picture.

(4) A purported waiver of the prohibition in this chapter against blind bidding or blind selling is void and unenforceable.

[ 1979 ex.s. c 29 s 3.]